test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - O - bgwaaniigin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     bgwaaniigin+NI: bgwaaniigin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI: nbagwaaniigin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI: gbagwaaniigin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI: bagwaaniigin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI: bagwaaniigin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con: bgwaaniignoonh
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim: bgwaaniignoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej: bgwaaniignosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Prt: bgwaaniignoba
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: bgwaaniignodig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     bgwaaniigin+NI+4: bgwaaniignoon
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Loc: bgwaaniignong
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Pl: bgwaaniignoon
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con: nbagwaaniignoonh
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim: nbagwaaniignoons
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con: gbagwaaniignoonh
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim: gbagwaaniignoons
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con: bagwaaniignoonh
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim: bagwaaniignoons
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con: bagwaaniignoonh
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim: bagwaaniignoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos: nbagwaaniignom
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos: gbagwaaniignom
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos: bagwaaniignom
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos: bagwaaniignom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej: nbagwaaniignosh
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej: gbagwaaniignosh
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej: bagwaaniignosh
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej: bagwaaniignosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl: nbagwaaniignonaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl: gbagwaaniignonaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl: gbagwaaniignowaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl: bagwaaniignowaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+3+4: bagwaaniignoni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Prt: nbagwaaniignoba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignodig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Prt: gbagwaaniignoba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignodig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Prt: bagwaaniignoba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignodig
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Prt: bagwaaniignoba
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignodig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+4: nbagwaaniignoon
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Loc: nbagwaaniignong
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pl: nbagwaaniignoon
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+4: gbagwaaniignoon
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Loc: gbagwaaniignong
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pl: gbagwaaniignoon
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+4: bagwaaniignoon
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Loc: bagwaaniignong
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pl: bagwaaniignoon
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+4: bagwaaniignoon
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Loc: bagwaaniignong
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pl: bagwaaniignoon
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: bgwaaniignoonyish
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: bgwaaniignoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: bgwaaniignoonyba
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: bgwaaniignoonydig
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: bgwaaniignoonsba
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: bgwaaniignoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: bgwaaniignoonyin
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: bgwaaniignoonying
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: bgwaaniignoonyin
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: bgwaaniignoonsan
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: bgwaaniignoonsing
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: bgwaaniignoonsan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: bgwaaniignoshba
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: bgwaaniignoshdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: bgwaaniignoshan
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: bgwaaniignoshing
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: bgwaaniignoshan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Prt+4: bgwaaniignobniin
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Prt+Loc: bgwaaniignobniing
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Prt+Pl: bgwaaniignobniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos: nbagwaaniignoonyim
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos: nbagwaaniignoonsim
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos: gbagwaaniignoonyim
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos: gbagwaaniignoonsim
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos: bagwaaniignoonyim
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos: bagwaaniignoonsim
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos: bagwaaniignoonyim
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos: bagwaaniignoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: nbagwaaniignoonyish
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: nbagwaaniignoonsish
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: gbagwaaniignoonyish
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: gbagwaaniignoonsish
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: bagwaaniignoonyish
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: bagwaaniignoonsish
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: bagwaaniignoonyish
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: bagwaaniignoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonynaa
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonynaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+2+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonywaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonswaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+2+Pl: bagwaaniignoonywaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4: bagwaaniignoonyni
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2+Pl: bagwaaniignoonswaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4: bagwaaniignoonsni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: nbagwaaniignoonyba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonydig
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: nbagwaaniignoonsba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsdig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonyba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonydig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonsba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsdig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: bagwaaniignoonyba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonydig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: bagwaaniignoonsba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsdig
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: bagwaaniignoonyba
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonydig
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: bagwaaniignoonsba
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: nbagwaaniignoonyin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonying
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonyin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: nbagwaaniignoonsan
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: gbagwaaniignoonyin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonying
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonyin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: gbagwaaniignoonsan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: bagwaaniignoonyin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: bagwaaniignoonying
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: bagwaaniignoonsan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: bagwaaniignoonyin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: bagwaaniignoonying
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: bagwaaniignoonyin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: bagwaaniignoonsan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej: nbagwaaniignomish
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej: gbagwaaniignomish
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej: bagwaaniignomish
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej: bagwaaniignomish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: nbagwaaniignomnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: gbagwaaniignomnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: gbagwaaniignomwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: bagwaaniignomwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+3+4: bagwaaniignomni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt: nbagwaaniignomba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignomdig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt: gbagwaaniignomba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignomdig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt: bagwaaniignomba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignomdig
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt: bagwaaniignomba
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignomdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+4: nbagwaaniignoman
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Loc: nbagwaaniignoming
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pl: nbagwaaniignoman
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+4: gbagwaaniignoman
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Loc: gbagwaaniignoming
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pl: gbagwaaniignoman
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+4: bagwaaniignoman
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Loc: bagwaaniignoming
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pl: bagwaaniignoman
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+4: bagwaaniignoman
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Loc: bagwaaniignoming
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pl: bagwaaniignoman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl: nbagwaaniignoshnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl: bagwaaniignoshwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4: bagwaaniignoshni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: nbagwaaniignoshba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoshdig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: gbagwaaniignoshba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshdig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniignoshba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoshdig
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniignoshba
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoshdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: nbagwaaniignoshan
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: nbagwaaniignoshing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: nbagwaaniignoshan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: gbagwaaniignoshan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: gbagwaaniignoshing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: bagwaaniignoshan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniignoshing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniignoshan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: bagwaaniignoshan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniignoshing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniignoshan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt: nbagwaaniignonaanba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignonaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignonaanba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignonaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignowaaba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignowaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Prt: bagwaaniignowaaba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignowaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Prt: bagwaaniignonwiba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignonwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+4: nbagwaaniignonaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Loc: nbagwaaniignonaaning
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Pl: nbagwaaniignonaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignonaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignonaaning
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignonaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignowaan
